District of Columbia statutes.
48-902.10

Schedule IV enumerated.

(a)

The controlled substances listed in this section are included in Schedule IV, unless and until removed therefrom pursuant to § 48-902.01:

(1)

Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which contains any quantity of the following substances, including its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers whenever the existence of such salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is possible within the specific chemical designation:

(A)

Barbital;

(B)

Chloral betaine;

(C)

Chloral hydrate;

(D)

Chlordiazepoxide;

(E)

Clonazepam;

(F)

Clorazepate;

(G)

Dextropropoxyphene;

(H)

Diazepam;

(I)

Ethchlorvynol;

(J)

Ethinamate;

(K)

Flurazepam;

(L)

Lorazepam;

(M)

Mebutamate;

(N)

Meprobamate;

(O)

Methohexital;

(P)

Methylphenobarbital (mephobarbital);

(Q)

Oxazepam;

(R)

Paraldehyde;

(S)

Petrichloral;

(T)

Phenobarbital;

(U)

Prazepam;

(V)

Alprazolam;

(W)

Bromazepam;

(X)

Camazepam;

(Y)

Clobazam;

(Z)

Clotiazepam;

(AA)

Cloxazolam;

(BB)

Delorazepam;

(CC)

Estazolam;

(DD)

Ethyl loflazepate;

(EE)

Fludiazepam;

(FF)

Flunitrazepam;

(GG)

Halazepam;

(HH)

Haloxazolam;

(II)

Ketazolam;

(JJ)

Loprazolam;

(KK)

Lormetazepam;

(LL)

Medazepam;

(MM)

Midazolam;

(NN)

Nimetazepam;

(OO)

Nitrazepam;

(PP)

Oxazolam;

(QQ)

Omitted;

(RR)

Pinazepam;

(SS)

Quazepam;

(TT)

Temazepam;

(UU)

Tetrazepam;

(VV)

Triazolam; and

(WW)

Fospropofol;

(2)

Any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which contains any quantity of the following substances, including its salts, isomers (whether optical, position, or geometric), and salts of such isomers, whenever the existence of such salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is possible, such as Fenfluramine;

(3)

Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which contains any quantity of the following substances having a stimulant effect on the central nervous system, including its salts, isomers (whether optical, position, or geometric), and salts of such isomers whenever the existence of such salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is possible within the specific chemical designation:

(A)

Diethylpropion;

(B)

Phentermine;

(C)

Pemoline (including organometallic complexes and chelates thereof);

(D)

Cathine;

(E)

Fencamfimin;

(F)

Fenproporex;

(G)

Mefenorex;

(H)

Pipradrol; and

(I)

SPA;

(4)

Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture or preparation which contains any quantity of the following substances, including its salts:

(A)

Dextropropoxyphene (Alpha-(+)-4-dimethylamino-1), 2-diphenyl-1-3-methyl-2-propionoxybutane; and

(B)

Pentazocine; and

(5)

Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation containing limited quantities of any of the following narcotic drugs, or any salts thereof of not more than 1 milligram of difenoxin and not less than 25 micrograms of atropine sulfate per dosage unit.

(b)

The Mayor may except by rule any compound, mixture, or preparation containing any depressant substance listed in paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of this section from the application of all or any part of this chapter if the compound, mixture, or preparation contains 1 or more active medicinal ingredients not having a depressant effect on the central nervous system, and if the admixtures are included therein in combinations, quantity, proportion, or concentration that vitiate the potential for abuse of the substances which have a depressant effect on the central nervous system.

Aug. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 4-29, § 210, 28 DCR 3081
amended by rule, 39 DCR 1882
June 19, 2013, D.C. Law 19-320, § 301(e), 60 DCR 3390

History

This section is referenced in § 7-3002, § 44-1201, § 48-853.01, § 48-902.01, § 48-902.02, and § 48-1004.

Section References

1981 Ed., § 33-520.

Prior Codifications

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-320 added (a)(1)(WW) and made related changes; and substituted “Cathine” for “Cathine” (made no change) in (a)(3)(D).

Effect of Amendments

For temporary amendment of (a), see § 301(e) of the Omnibus Criminal Code Amendments Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-599, January 14, 2013, 60 DCR 1017).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 301(e) of the Omnibus Criminal Code Amendment Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-44, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5381, 20 DCSTAT 1281).

Emergency Legislation